Washington statutes.
RCW 43.22.490

Factory built housing and commercial structures, regulating installation of—Violation as misdemeanor—Penalty.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of RCW 43.22.450 through 43.22.490 or any rules or regulations adopted pursuant to RCW 43.22.450 through 43.22.490 is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars or by imprisonment not exceeding thirty days, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

[ 1970 ex.s. c 44 s 9.]